Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.200

Duty of owner or agent—Livestock inspection.

Any owner or his or her agent shall make livestock being inspected readily accessible and shall cooperate with the director to carry out the inspection in a safe and expeditious manner.

[ 2003 c 326 s 22; 1959 c 54 s 20.]